Colorado, session 2026A, HB1405.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
SECTION 1. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 8-15.7-305, add (3.7)
as follows:
8-15.7-305. Scale-up grant fund - creation - gifts, grants, or
donations - transfer.
(3.7) ON JUNE 30, 2026, THE STATE TREASURER SHALL TRANSFER
ONE MILLION FIFTY-SEVEN THOUSAND ONE DOLLARS FROM THE FUND TO THE
GENERAL FUND.
SECTION 2. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 8-15.7-405, add (3.7)
as follows:
8-15.7-405. Qualified apprenticeship intermediary grant fund
________
Capital letters or bold & italic numbers indicate new material added to existing law; dashes
through words or numbers indicate deletions from existing law and such material is not part of
the act.

- creation - transfer - gifts, grants, or donations.
(3.7) ON JUNE 30, 2026, THE STATE TREASURER SHALL TRANSFER
SEVEN HUNDRED NINETY-SIX THOUSAND NINE HUNDRED FIFTY-NINE
DOLLARS FROM THE FUND TO THE GENERAL FUND.
SECTION 3. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 8-44-206, add
(3)(b)(III) as follows:
8-44-206. Guaranty fund - immediate payment fund - legislative
declaration - repeal.
(3) Immediate payment fund - assessments - creation of fund.
(b) (III) (A) NOTWITHSTANDING ANY PROVISION OF THIS SECTION TO
THE CONTRARY, ON JUNE 30, 2026, THE STATE TREASURER SHALL TRANSFER
TWO HUNDRED THOUSAND DOLLARS FROM THE IMMEDIATE PAYMENT FUND
TO THE GENERAL FUND.
(B) THIS SUBSECTION (3)(b)(III) IS REPEALED, EFFECTIVE JULY 1,
2027.
SECTION 4. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 8-67-105, add (4) as
follows:
8-67-105. Colorado uninsured employer fund - repeal.
(4) (a) NOTWITHSTANDING ANY PROVISION OF SUBSECTION (2)(e) OF
THIS SECTION TO THE CONTRARY, ON JUNE 30, 2026, THE STATE TREASURER
SHALL TRANSFER FIVE HUNDRED THOUSAND DOLLARS FROM THE FUND TO
THE GENERAL FUND.
(b) THIS SUBSECTION (4) IS REPEALED, EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2027.
SECTION 5. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 19-1-307, add (2.5)(c)
as follows:
19-1-307. Dependency and neglect records and information -
access - fee - records and reports fund - misuse of information - penalty
- adult protective services data system check - rules - repeal.
PAGE 2-HOUSE BILL 26-1405

(2.5) Fee - records and reports fund - rules.
(c) (I) ON JUNE 30, 2026, THE STATE TREASURER SHALL TRANSFER
SEVEN HUNDRED FIFTY THOUSAND DOLLARS FROM THE RECORDS AND
REPORTS FUND TO THE GENERAL FUND.
(II) THIS SUBSECTION (2.5)(c) IS REPEALED, EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2027.
SECTION 6. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 23-3.1-306.5, add (10)
as follows:
23-3.1-306.5. College kickstarter account program - funding -
administration - financial literacy course - rules - legislative declaration
- definitions - repeal.
(10) (a) NOTWITHSTANDING ANY PROVISION OF THIS SECTION TO THE
CONTRARY, ON JUNE 30, 2026, OF MONEY CREDITED TO THE KICKSTARTER
PROGRAM MASTER ACCOUNT OTHER THAN MONEY DESIGNATED FOR AN
ELIGIBLE CHILD, THE STATE TREASURER SHALL, IN CONSULTATION WITH THE
AUTHORITY, TRANSFER NINE MILLION TWO HUNDRED THOUSAND DOLLARS
TO THE GENERAL FUND.
(b) THIS SUBSECTION (10) IS REPEALED, EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2027.
SECTION 7. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 24-21-404, add (4) as
follows:
24-21-404. Electronic recording technology fund - electronic
filing - grants - repeal.
(4) (a) NOTWITHSTANDING ANY PROVISION OF SUBSECTION (1)(b) OF
THIS SECTION TO THE CONTRARY, ON JUNE 30, 2026, THE STATE TREASURER
SHALL TRANSFER TWO HUNDRED THOUSAND DOLLARS FROM THE FUND TO
THE GENERAL FUND.
(b) THIS SUBSECTION (4) IS REPEALED, EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2027.
SECTION 8. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 24-22-115, add (2)(h)
as follows:
PAGE 3-HOUSE BILL 26-1405

24-22-115. Tobacco litigation settlement cash fund - health-care
supplemental appropriations and overexpenditures account - creation
- repeal.
(2) (h) (I) NOTWITHSTANDING ANY PROVISION OF THIS SECTION TO
THE CONTRARY, ON JUNE 30, 2026, THE STATE TREASURER SHALL TRANSFER
TWO HUNDRED FIFTY THOUSAND DOLLARS FROM THE TOBACCO SETTLEMENT
DEFENSE ACCOUNT WITHIN THE TOBACCO LITIGATION SETTLEMENT CASH
FUND TO THE GENERAL FUND.
(II) THIS SUBSECTION (2)(h) IS REPEALED, EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2027.
SECTION 9. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 24-32-728, add (10)(e)
as follows:
24-32-728. Mobile home park resident empowerment loan
program - fund - creation - policies - report - legislative declaration -
definitions - repeal.
(10) (e) (I) ON JUNE 30, 2027, AND ON EACH JUNE 30 THEREAFTER
THROUGH JUNE 30, 2033, THE STATE TREASURER SHALL TRANSFER FOUR
HUNDRED THOUSAND DOLLARS FROM THE FUND TO THE GENERAL FUND.
(II) THIS SUBSECTION (10)(e) IS REPEALED, EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2034.
SECTION 10. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 24-32-3501, amend
(7)(e)(II); and add (7)(e)(I.5) as follows:
24-32-3501. Peace officers behavioral health support and
community partnerships grant program - created - report - rules - fund
- definitions - repeal.
(7) (e) (I.5) ON JULY 1, 2026, THE STATE TREASURER SHALL
TRANSFER FOUR HUNDRED THOUSAND DOLLARS FROM THE FUND TO THE
GENERAL FUND.
(II) This subsection (7)(e) is repealed, effective July 1, 2026 JULY
1, 2027.
SECTION 11. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 24-32-3805, amend
PAGE 4-HOUSE BILL 26-1405

(5) as follows:
24-32-3805. Child care facility development cash fund -
definitions - repeal.
(5) (a) (I) ON JULY 1, 2026, THE STATE TREASURER SHALL TRANSFER
ONE HUNDRED SEVENTEEN THOUSAND FIVE HUNDRED FIFTY-ONE DOLLARS
FROM THE FUND TO THE GENERAL FUND.
(II) THIS SUBSECTION (5)(a) IS REPEALED, EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2027.
(b) The state treasurer shall transfer all unexpended and
unencumbered money in the fund on June 30, 2029, to the general fund.
SECTION 12. In Colorado Revised Statutes, amend 24-33.5-426
as follows:
24-33.5-426. Colorado bureau of investigation identification unit
fund - repeal.
(1) All moneys MONEY collected by the department for the purposes
of fingerprint criminal history record checks and name criminal history
record checks shall be transmitted to the state treasurer, who shall credit the
same to the Colorado bureau of investigation identification unit fund, which
fund is hereby created and referred to in this section as the "fund". In
addition, the fund may consist of moneys MONEY that may be appropriated
to the fund by the general assembly. The moneys MONEY in the fund shall
be IS subject to annual appropriation by the general assembly for the direct
and indirect costs associated with conducting criminal history record
checks. Any moneys MONEY in the fund not expended for the purpose of
criminal history record checks may be invested by the state treasurer as
provided by law. All interest and income derived from the investment and
deposit of moneys in the fund shall be credited to the fund. Any unexpended
and unencumbered moneys MONEY remaining in the fund at the end of a
fiscal year shall remain in the fund and shall not be credited or transferred
to the general fund or another fund.
(2) (a) NOTWITHSTANDING SUBSECTION (1) OF THIS SECTION, ON
JUNE 30, 2026, THE STATE TREASURER SHALL TRANSFER ONE MILLION
DOLLARS FROM THE FUND TO THE GENERAL FUND.
PAGE 5-HOUSE BILL 26-1405

(b) THIS SUBSECTION (2) IS REPEALED, EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2027.
SECTION 13. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 24-33.5-527, add
(4)(b)(II)(D) as follows:
24-33.5-527. Multidisciplinary crime prevention and crisis
intervention grant program - committee - fund - reports - repeal.
(4) (b) (II) (D) NOTWITHSTANDING ANY PROVISION OF THIS
SUBSECTION (4) TO THE CONTRARY, ON JULY 1, 2026, THE STATE TREASURER
SHALL TRANSFER FOUR HUNDRED TWENTY-SEVEN THOUSAND ONE HUNDRED
THIRTEEN DOLLARS FROM THE FUND TO THE GENERAL FUND.
SECTION 14. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 24-33.5-528, add
(4)(e)(IV) as follows:
24-33.5-528. Law enforcement workforce recruitment, retention,
and tuition grant program - committee - fund - reports - repeal.
(4) (e) (IV) NOTWITHSTANDING ANY PROVISION OF THIS SUBSECTION
(4) TO THE CONTRARY, ON JULY 1, 2026, THE STATE TREASURER SHALL
TRANSFER ONE HUNDRED ELEVEN THOUSAND ONE HUNDRED NINETY-ONE
DOLLARS FROM THE FUND TO THE GENERAL FUND.
SECTION 15. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 24-33.5-529, amend
(4)(e)(II); and add (4)(e)(1.5) as follows:
24-33.5-529. State's mission for assistance in recruiting and
training (SMART) grant program - committee - fund - reports -
definitions - repeal.
(4) (e) (I.5) NOTWITHSTANDING ANY PROVISION OF THIS SUBSECTION
(4) TO THE CONTRARY, ON JULY 1, 2026, THE STATE TREASURER SHALL
TRANSFER SIX HUNDRED EIGHTY-SIX THOUSAND EIGHT HUNDRED NINETY
DOLLARS FROM THE FUND TO THE GENERAL FUND.
(II) This subsection (4)(e) is repealed, effective July 1, 2026 JULY
1, 2027.
SECTION 16. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 24-37.5-103, add (5)
PAGE 6-HOUSE BILL 26-1405

as follows:
24-37.5-103. Office of information technology - creation -
information technology revolving fund - geographic information system
coordination - repeal.
(5) (a) NOTWITHSTANDING ANY PROVISION OF SUBSECTION (3)(c) OF
THIS SECTION TO THE CONTRARY, ON JUNE 30, 2026, THE STATE TREASURER
SHALL TRANSFER ELEVEN MILLION DOLLARS FROM THE INFORMATION
TECHNOLOGY REVOLVING FUND TO THE GENERAL FUND.
(b) NOTWITHSTANDING ANY PROVISION OF SUBSECTION (3)(c) OF
THIS SECTION TO THE CONTRARY, ON JUNE 30, 2027, THE STATE TREASURER
SHALL TRANSFER TWENTY MILLION DOLLARS FROM THE INFORMATION
TECHNOLOGY REVOLVING FUND TO THE GENERAL FUND.
(c) THIS SUBSECTION (5) IS REPEALED, EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2028.
SECTION 17. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 24-37.5-120, amend
(7)(b); and add (7)(a.1) as follows:
24-37.5-120. Technology risk prevention and response fund -
creation - definitions - repeal.
(7) (a.1) NOTWITHSTANDING ANY PROVISION OF THIS SECTION TO
THE CONTRARY, ON JUNE 30, 2026, THE STATE TREASURER SHALL TRANSFER
TEN MILLION DOLLARS FROM THE FUND TO THE GENERAL FUND.
(b) This subsection (7) is repealed, effective July 1, 2026 JULY 1,
2027.
SECTION 18. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 24-38.5-120, add
(4.5) as follows:
24-38.5-120. Decarbonization tax credits administration cash
fund - definitions - repeal.
(4.5) NOTWITHSTANDING ANY PROVISION OF THIS SECTION TO THE
CONTRARY, ON JUNE 30, 2027, THE STATE TREASURER SHALL TRANSFER THE
UNEXPENDED AND UNENCUMBERED BALANCE OF THE FUND TO THE GENERAL
PAGE 7-HOUSE BILL 26-1405

FUND.
SECTION 19. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 24-48.5-608, amend
(2)(c)(II); and add (2)(c)(I.1) as follows:
24-48.5-608. Small business recovery and resiliency fund -
repeal.
(2) (c) (I.1) ON JUNE 30, 2026, THE STATE TREASURER SHALL
TRANSFER FIFTEEN MILLION DOLLARS FROM THE SMALL BUSINESS RECOVERY
AND RESILIENCY FUND TO THE GENERAL FUND.
(II) This subsection (2)(c) is repealed, effective July 1, 2026 JULY
1, 2027.
SECTION 20. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 24-50-609, amend
(5)(c)(II); and add (5)(c)(I.1) as follows:
24-50-609. State contributions - supplemental state contribution
fund - creation - repeal.
(5) (c) (I.1) NOTWITHSTANDING ANY PROVISION OF SUBSECTION
(5)(a) OF THIS SECTION TO THE CONTRARY, ON JUNE 30, 2026, THE STATE
TREASURER SHALL TRANSFER ONE MILLION DOLLARS FROM THE
SUPPLEMENTAL STATE CONTRIBUTION FUND TO THE GENERAL FUND.
(II) This subsection (5)(c) is repealed, effective July 1, 2026 JULY
1, 2027.
SECTION 21. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 24-75-232, amend
(4)(c) as follows:
24-75-232. "Infrastructure Investment and Jobs Act" cash fund
- creation - allowable uses - report - compliance monitoring - legislative
declaration - definitions - repeal.
(4) (c) (I) ON JULY 1, 2026, THE STATE TREASURER SHALL TRANSFER
FIFTEEN MILLION DOLLARS FROM THE FUND TO THE GENERAL FUND.
(II) On June 30, 2028, the state treasurer shall transfer all
PAGE 8-HOUSE BILL 26-1405

unexpended money in the fund to the general fund.
SECTION 22. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 24-75-302.5, add (13)
as follows:
24-75-302.5. Controlled maintenance - trust fund - legislative
declaration.
(13) NOTWITHSTANDING ANY PROVISION OF THIS SECTION TO THE
CONTRARY, ON JUNE 30, 2026, THE STATE TREASURER SHALL TRANSFER THE
UNEXPENDED AND UNENCUMBERED BALANCE OF THE CONTROLLED
MAINTENANCE TRUST FUND TO THE GENERAL FUND.
SECTION 23. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 24-75-1401, amend
(2)(b)(III)(B); and add (2)(b)(III)(A.1) as follows:
24-75-1401. Indirect costs excess recovery fund - creation -
departmental accounts - use of fund - definitions - repeal.
(2) (b) (III) (A.1) ON JUNE 30, 2026, THE STATE TREASURER SHALL
TRANSFER ONE MILLION DOLLARS FROM THE ACCOUNT FOR THE DEPARTMENT
OF PUBLIC SAFETY WITHIN THE INDIRECT COSTS EXCESS RECOVERY FUND TO
THE GENERAL FUND.
(B) This subsection (2)(b)(III) is repealed, effective July 1, 2026
JULY 1, 2027.
SECTION 24. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 24-82-102.5, add
(5)(e) as follows:
24-82-102.5. Unused state-owned real property - cash fund -
legislative declaration - definitions - repeal.
(5) (e) (I) ON JUNE 30, 2026, THE STATE TREASURER SHALL
TRANSFER EIGHT HUNDRED THOUSAND DOLLARS FROM THE FUND TO THE
GENERAL FUND.
(II) THIS SUBSECTION (5)(e) IS REPEALED, EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2027.
SECTION 25. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 24-102-202.5, amend
PAGE 9-HOUSE BILL 26-1405

(2)(c)(III)(B); and add (2)(c)(III)(A.1) as follows:
24-102-202.5. Supplier database - fees - cash fund - program
account - repeal.
(2) (c) (III) (A.1) ON JUNE 30, 2026, THE STATE TREASURER SHALL
TRANSFER FIVE MILLION FOUR HUNDRED THOUSAND DOLLARS FROM THE
SUPPLIER DATABASE CASH FUND TO THE GENERAL FUND.
(B) This subsection (2)(c)(III) is repealed, effective July 1, 2026
JULY 1, 2027.
SECTION 26. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 25-3.5-307, add (2)(c)
as follows:
25-3.5-307. Licensure of fixed-wing and rotor-wing air
ambulances - cash fund created - rules - repeal.
(2) (c) (I) NOTWITHSTANDING ANY PROVISION OF SUBSECTION (2)(b)
OF THIS SECTION TO THE CONTRARY, ON JUNE 30, 2026, THE STATE
TREASURER SHALL TRANSFER TWO HUNDRED FIFTEEN THOUSAND DOLLARS
FROM THE FIXED-WING AND ROTARY-WING AMBULANCES CASH FUND TO THE
GENERAL FUND.
(II) THIS SUBSECTION (2)(c) IS REPEALED, EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2027.
SECTION 27. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 25-7-129, amend
(4)(b); and add (4)(a.1) and (4)(a.3) as follows:
25-7-129. Disposition of fines - community impact cash fund -
repeal.
(4) (a.1) ON JUNE 30, 2026, THE STATE TREASURER SHALL TRANSFER
FIVE MILLION ONE HUNDRED SIXTY-TWO THOUSAND THREE HUNDRED
SEVENTY-THREE DOLLARS FROM THE FUND TO THE GENERAL FUND.
(a.3) ON JUNE 30, 2027, THE STATE TREASURER SHALL TRANSFER
FIVE MILLION DOLLARS FROM THE FUND TO THE GENERAL FUND.
(b) This subsection (4) is repealed, effective July 1, 2026 JULY 1,
PAGE 10-HOUSE BILL 26-1405

2028.
SECTION 28. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 25-7-1405, amend
(4)(c); and add (4)(b.1) as follows:
25-7-1405. Electrifying school buses grant program cash fund
- creation - gifts, grants, and donations - transfer - repeal.
(4) (b.1) NOTWITHSTANDING ANY PROVISION OF SUBSECTION (2)(a)
OF THIS SECTION TO THE CONTRARY, ON JULY 1, 2026, THE STATE
TREASURER SHALL TRANSFER AN AMOUNT EQUAL TO THE UNEXPENDED AND
UNENCUMBERED BALANCE OF THE FUND MINUS SEVEN HUNDRED
NINETY-NINE THOUSAND TWO HUNDRED DOLLARS FROM THE FUND TO THE
GENERAL FUND.
(c) This subsection (4) is repealed, effective July 1, 2026 JULY 1,
2027.
SECTION 29. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 25-8-902, add (7) as
follows:
25-8-902. School and child care clean drinking water fund -
creation - repeal.
(7) (a) NOTWITHSTANDING ANY PROVISION OF THIS SECTION TO THE
CONTRARY, ON JUNE 28, 2026, THE STATE TREASURER SHALL TRANSFER FIVE
MILLION THREE HUNDRED THOUSAND DOLLARS FROM THE FUND TO THE
GENERAL FUND.
(b) THIS SUBSECTION (7) IS REPEALED, EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2027.
SECTION 30. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 25-8-1006, add (4) as
follows:
25-8-1006. Mobile home park water quality fund - repeal.
(4) (a) ON JUNE 30, 2026, THE STATE TREASURER SHALL TRANSFER
THREE MILLION DOLLARS FROM THE FUND TO THE GENERAL FUND.
(b) THIS SUBSECTION (4) IS REPEALED, EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2027.
PAGE 11-HOUSE BILL 26-1405

SECTION 31. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 39-3-211, add (7)(e)
as follows:
39-3-211. Reporting of assessed value reductions -
reimbursement of local governmental entities - local governmental
entity backfill cash fund - creation - legislative declaration - definitions
- repeal.
(7) (e) NOTWITHSTANDING ANY PROVISION OF THIS SECTION TO THE
CONTRARY, ON JUNE 12, 2026, THE STATE TREASURER SHALL TRANSFER
SIXTEEN THOUSAND SEVEN HUNDRED FORTY-SEVEN DOLLARS FROM THE
FUND TO THE GENERAL FUND.
SECTION 32. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 39-29-109.3, add (14)
and (15) as follows:
39-29-109.3. Severance tax operational fund - core reserve -
grant program reserve - definitions - repeal.
(14) (a) ON JUNE 30, 2026, THE STATE TREASURER SHALL TRANSFER
SEVEN MILLION TWO HUNDRED FIFTY-TWO THOUSAND NINE HUNDRED
NINETY-SIX DOLLARS FROM THE FUND TO THE GENERAL FUND.
(b) THIS SUBSECTION (14) IS REPEALED, EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2027.
(15) (a) ON JUNE 30, 2027, THE STATE TREASURER SHALL TRANSFER
ELEVEN MILLION ONE HUNDRED FIFTY THOUSAND DOLLARS FROM THE FUND
TO THE GENERAL FUND.
(b) THIS SUBSECTION (15) IS REPEALED, EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2028.
SECTION 33. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 39-29-110, add (7)(g)
and (7)(h) as follows:
39-29-110. Local government severance tax fund - creation -
administration - definitions - repeal.
(7) Notwithstanding any provision of this section to the contrary:
(g) ON JUNE 30, 2026, THE STATE TREASURER SHALL TRANSFER
PAGE 12-HOUSE BILL 26-1405

NINETEEN MILLION FOUR HUNDRED THOUSAND DOLLARS FROM THE LOCAL
GOVERNMENT SEVERANCE TAX FUND TO THE GENERAL FUND.
(h) ON JUNE 30, 2027, THE STATE TREASURER SHALL TRANSFER
TWENTY-SEVEN MILLION THREE HUNDRED THOUSAND DOLLARS FROM THE
LOCAL GOVERNMENT SEVERANCE TAX FUND TO THE GENERAL FUND.
SECTION 34. Safety clause. The general assembly finds,
determines, and declares that this act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety or for appropriations for
PAGE 13-HOUSE BILL 26-1405

the support and maintenance of the departments of the state and state
institutions.
____________________________ ____________________________
Julie McCluskie James Rashad Coleman, Sr.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE PRESIDENT OF
OF REPRESENTATIVES THE SENATE
____________________________ ____________________________
Vanessa Reilly Esther van Mourik
CHIEF CLERK OF THE HOUSE SECRETARY OF
OF REPRESENTATIVES THE SENATE
APPROVED________________________________________
(Date and Time)
_________________________________________
Jared S. Polis
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF COLORADO
PAGE 14-HOUSE BILL 26-1405